Washington statutes.
RCW 19.27.510

"Nightclub" defined.

As used in this chapter:

"Nightclub" means an A-2 occupancy use under the 2006 international building code in which the aggregate area of concentrated use of unfixed chairs and standing space that is specifically designated and primarily used for dancing or viewing performers exceeds three hundred fifty square feet, excluding adjacent lobby areas. "Nightclub" does not include theaters with fixed seating, banquet halls, or lodge halls.

[ 2007 c 434 s 2; 2005 c 148 s 2.]